Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/mn_affix.dat
SFX M Y 18
SFX M 0 ууд .
SFX M 0 уудаа .
SFX M 0 уудын .
SFX M 0 уудыг .
SFX M 0 уудад .
SFX M 0 уудтай .
SFX M 0 уудаас .
SFX M 0 уудаар .
SFX M 0 уудынх .
SFX M 0 ууддаа .
SFX M 0 уудгүй .
SFX M 0 уудыгаа .
SFX M 0 уудтайг .
SFX M 0 уудгүйг .
SFX M 0 уудынхаа .
SFX M 0 уудаасаа .
SFX M 0 уудаараа .
SFX M 0 уудтайгаа .

SFX N Y 49
SFX N 0 дэггүйгээ .
SFX N 0 дэггүйгээс .
SFX N 0 дэггүйгээр .
SFX N 0 дэггүйтэй .
SFX N 0 сэнгүйгээ .
SFX N 0 сэнгүйгээс .
SFX N 0 сэнгүйгээр .
SFX N 0 сэнгүйтэй .
SFX N 0 дэгийнх .
SFX N 0 дэгээсээ .
SFX N 0 дэгээрээ .
SFX N 0 дэгийгээ .
SFX N 0 дэгийнхээ .
SFX N 0 сэнээсээ .
SFX N 0 сэнээрээ .
SFX N 0 сэнийхээ .
SFX N 0 сэнийгээ .
SFX N 0 эхээсээ .
SFX N 0 эхээрээ .
SFX N 0 эхийгээ .
SFX N 0 эгчийнх .
SFX N 0 эгчдээс .
SFX N 0 эгчдээр .
SFX N 0 эгчдийн .
SFX N 0 эгчдийг .
SFX N 0 эхтэйгээ .
SFX N 0 эхийнхээ .
SFX N 0 эгчээсээ .
SFX N 0 эгчээрээ .
SFX N 0 эгчийгээ .
SFX N 0 эгчидтэй .
SFX N 0 эгчидгүй .
SFX N 0 эгчдэдээ .
SFX N 0 эгчдийнх .
SFX N 0 эхлээрээ .
SFX N 0 эгчтэйгээ .
SFX N 0 эгчийнхээ .
SFX N 0 эгчдээсээ .
SFX N 0 эгчдээрээ .
SFX N 0 эгчдийгээ .
SFX N 0 эгчдийнхээ .
SFX N 0 эгчидтэйгээ .
SFX N 0 эхгүйн .
SFX N 0 эхгүйг .
SFX N 0 эхгүйд .
SFX N 0 эхгүйгээ .
SFX N 0 эхгүйгээс .
SFX N 0 эхгүйгээр .
SFX N 0 эхгүйтэй .

SFX O Y 55
SFX O 0 чихъё .
SFX O 0 чихно .
SFX O 0 чихтой .
SFX O 0 чихсон .
SFX O 0 чихлоо .
SFX O 0 чихдоо .
SFX O 0 чихдог .
SFX O 0 чихвол .
SFX O 0 чихсоны .
SFX O 0 чихсонд .
SFX O 0 чихмоор .
SFX O 0 чихмогц .
SFX O 0 чихлоор .
SFX O 0 чихдогт .
SFX O 0 чихсоных .
SFX O 0 чихсоныг .
SFX O 0 чихсоноо .
SFX O 0 чихдогоо .
SFX O 0 чихтойгоо .
SFX O 0 чихсоныхоо .
SFX O 0 чихсоныгоо .
SFX O 0 чихсонтой .
SFX O 0 чихсоноос .
SFX O 0 чихсоноор .
SFX O 0 чихсондоо .
SFX O 0 чихсонгүй .
SFX O 0 чихмооргүй .
SFX O 0 чихмогцоо .
SFX O 0 чихлоороо .
SFX O 0 чихдогтоо .
SFX O 0 чихдогтой .
SFX O 0 чихдогоос .
SFX O 0 чихдогоор .
SFX O 0 чихдогийнх .
SFX O 0 чихдогийн .
SFX O 0 чихдогийг .
SFX O 0 чихдоггүй .
SFX O 0 чихсонтойгоо .
SFX O 0 чихсоноосоо .
SFX O 0 чихсоноороо .
SFX O 0 чихдогтойгоо .
SFX O 0 чихдогоосоо .
SFX O 0 чихдогоороо .
SFX O 0 чихдогийнхоо .
SFX O 0 чихдогийгоо .
SFX O 0 чихсонгүйн .
SFX O 0 чихсонгүйд .
SFX O 0 чихсонгүйг .
SFX O 0 чихдоггүйн .
SFX O 0 чихдоггүйд .
SFX O 0 чихдоггүйг .
SFX O 0 чихсонгүйтэй .
SFX O 0 чихсонгүйгээ .
SFX O 0 чихдоггүйтэй .
SFX O 0 чихдоггүйгээ .

SFX P Y 135
SFX P 0 д .
SFX P 0 даа .
SFX P 0 даг .
SFX P 0 джээ .
SFX P 0 дан .
SFX P 0 дсан .
SFX P 0 дсаар .
SFX P 0 дсандаа .
SFX P 0 дсанд .
SFX P 0 дах .
SFX P 0 дагчтай .
SFX P 0 дагчийн .
SFX P 0 дагчийг .
SFX P 0 дагчид .
SFX P 0 дагчдын .
SFX P 0 дагчдыг .
SFX P 0 дагчдад .
SFX P 0 дагчдаа .
SFX P 0 дагчгүй .
SFX P 0 дагчаас .
SFX P 0 дагчаар .
SFX P 0 дагчаа .
SFX P 0 дагч .
SFX P 0 даагүй .
SFX P 0 дахынх .
SFX P 0 дахын .
SFX P 0 дахыгаа .
SFX P 0 дахыг .
SFX P 0 дахтай .
SFX P 0 дахдаа .
SFX P 0 дахгүй .
SFX P 0 дахад .
SFX P 0 дахаас .
SFX P 0 дахаар .
SFX P 0 дахаа .
SFX P 0 даад .
SFX P 0 дангаа .
SFX P 0 даж .
SFX P 0 давч .
SFX P 0 дав .
SFX P 0 даач .
SFX P 0 даасай .
SFX P 0 даарай .
SFX P 0 дахлаар .
SFX P 0 дангуут .
SFX P 0 дагчийнх .
SFX P 0 дагчдынх .
SFX P 0 дагчдаас .
SFX P 0 дагчдаар .
SFX P 0 дахынхаа .
SFX P 0 дахаасаа .
SFX P 0 дахаараа .
SFX P 0 дагчийгаа .
SFX P 0 дагчидтай .
SFX P 0 дагчидгүй .
SFX P 0 дагчдыгаа .
SFX P 0 дагчдадаа .
SFX P 0 дагчаасаа .
SFX P 0 дагчаараа .
SFX P 0 длаа .
SFX P 0 дахтайгаа .
SFX P 0 дагчтайгаа .
SFX P 0 дагчийнхаа .
SFX P 0 дагчдынхаа .
SFX P 0 дагчдаасаа .
SFX P 0 дагчдаараа .
SFX P 0 дахлаараа .
SFX P 0 дангуутаа .
SFX P 0 дагчидтайгаа .
SFX P 0 дмаар .
SFX P 0 дъя .
SFX P 0 дталаа .
SFX P 0 дтал .
SFX P 0 дсаных .
SFX P 0 дсаныг .
SFX P 0 дсаны .
SFX P 0 дсантай .
SFX P 0 дсангүй .
SFX P 0 дсанаас .
SFX P 0 дсанаар .
SFX P 0 дсанаа .
SFX P 0 дмагцаа .
SFX P 0 дмагц .
SFX P 0 ддагтай .
SFX P 0 ддагтаа .
SFX P 0 ддагт .
SFX P 0 ддагийн .
SFX P 0 ддагийг .
SFX P 0 ддаггүй .
SFX P 0 ддагаас .
SFX P 0 ддагаар .
SFX P 0 ддагаа .
SFX P 0 ддаг .
SFX P 0 двал .
SFX P 0 дсаныхаа .
SFX P 0 дсаныгаа .
SFX P 0 дмааргүй .
SFX P 0 ддагийнх .
SFX P 0 дахгүйн .
SFX P 0 дсанаасаа .
SFX P 0 дсанаараа .
SFX P 0 ддагийгаа .
SFX P 0 ддагаасаа .
SFX P 0 ддагаараа .
SFX P 0 дсантайгаа .
SFX P 0 ддагтайгаа .
SFX P 0 ддагийнхаа .
SFX P 0 даагүйг .
SFX P 0 даагүйн .
SFX P 0 даагүйд .
SFX P 0 дахгүйг .
SFX P 0 дахгүйд .
SFX P 0 даагүйгээ .
SFX P 0 дахгүйгээ .
SFX P 0 даагүйгээр .
SFX P 0 даагүйгээс .
SFX P 0 дахгүйгээс .
SFX P 0 дахгүйгээр .
SFX P 0 даагүйтэй .
SFX P 0 ддаггүйг .
SFX P 0 дсангүйн .
SFX P 0 дсангүйд .
SFX P 0 дсангүйг .
SFX P 0 ддаггүйн .
SFX P 0 ддаггүйд .
SFX P 0 дахгүйтэй .
SFX P 0 ддаггүйгээ .
SFX P 0 дсангүйгээ .
SFX P 0 дана .
SFX P 0 дсангүйтэй .
SFX P 0 ддаггүйтэй .
SFX P 0 ддаггүйгээр .
SFX P 0 дсангүйгээс .
SFX P 0 дсангүйгээр .
SFX P 0 ддаггүйгээс .

SFX Q Y 12
SFX Q 0 сны .
SFX Q 0 сных .
SFX Q 0 сныг .
SFX Q 0 тлаа .
SFX Q 0 дгаа .
SFX Q 0 снаа .
SFX Q 0 дгаас .
SFX Q 0 дгаар .
SFX Q 0 снаас .
SFX Q 0 сныхаа .
SFX Q 0 снаар .
SFX Q 0 сныгаа .

SFX R Y 28
SFX R 0 вал .
SFX R 0 хыг .
SFX R 0 хын .
SFX R 0 хынх .
SFX R 0 гчдын .
SFX R 0 гчдыг .
SFX R 0 гчдынх .
SFX R 0 нгуут .
SFX R 0 нгуутаа .
SFX R 0 хаас .
SFX R 0 хаар .
SFX R 0 хад .
SFX R 0 хаасаа .
SFX R 0 хаараа .
SFX R 0 хыгаа .
SFX R 0 хынхаа .
SFX R 0 хтай .
SFX R 0 хдаа .
SFX R 0 я .
SFX R 0 хтайгаа .
SFX R 0 гчаа .
SFX R 0 нгаа .
SFX R 0 гчтай .
SFX R 0 гчдад .
SFX R 0 гчдаа .
SFX R 0 гчаас .
SFX R 0 гчаар .
SFX R 0 гчдаас .

SFX S Y 9
SFX S 0 тай .
SFX S 0 тайгаа .
SFX S 0 аар .
SFX S 0 аас .
SFX S 0 аараа .
SFX S 0 аасаа .
SFX S 0 ыг .
SFX S 0 ыгаа .
SFX S 0 ын .
SFX T Y 14
SFX T 0 саар .
SFX T 0 тал .
SFX T 0 аад .
SFX T 0 аач .
SFX T 0 аагүй .
SFX T 0 аарай .
SFX T 0 аасай .
SFX T 0 ан .
SFX T 0 аг .
SFX T 0 ав .
SFX T 0 авч .
SFX T 0 ангаа .
SFX T 0 ангуут .
SFX T 0 ангуутаа .

SFX U Y 9
SFX U 0 гүйд .
SFX U 0 гүйгээр .
SFX U 0 гүйгээс .
SFX U 0 гүйн .
SFX U 0 тайг .
SFX U 0 тайд .
SFX U 0 тайгаар .
SFX U 0 тайгаас .
SFX U 0 тайн .

SFX V Y 61
SFX V 0 лаг .
SFX V 0 лан .
SFX V 0 лах .
SFX V 0 лагч .
SFX V 0 лавч .
SFX V 0 лав .
SFX V 0 лаач .
SFX V 0 лаад .
SFX V 0 лахын .
SFX V 0 лахыг .
SFX V 0 лахад .
SFX V 0 лахаа .
SFX V 0 лангаа .
SFX V 0 лаагүй .
SFX V 0 лахтай .
SFX V 0 лахгүй .
SFX V 0 лахаас .
SFX V 0 лахаар .
SFX V 0 лагчтай .
SFX V 0 лагчийн .
SFX V 0 лагчийг .
SFX V 0 лагчид .
SFX V 0 лагчдын .
SFX V 0 лагчдыг .
SFX V 0 лагчдад .
SFX V 0 лагчдаа .
SFX V 0 лагчгүй .
SFX V 0 лагчаас .
SFX V 0 лагчаар .
SFX V 0 лагчаа .
SFX V 0 лаасай .
SFX V 0 лаарай .
SFX V 0 лахынх .
SFX V 0 лахыгаа .
SFX V 0 лахлаар .
SFX V 0 лахдаа .
SFX V 0 лангуут .
SFX V 0 лагчийнх .
SFX V 0 лагчдынх .
SFX V 0 лагчдаас .
SFX V 0 лагчдаар .
SFX V 0 лахынхаа .
SFX V 0 лахаасаа .
SFX V 0 лахаараа .
SFX V 0 лагчийгаа .
SFX V 0 лагчидтай .
SFX V 0 лагчидгүй .
SFX V 0 лагчдыгаа .
SFX V 0 лагчдадаа .
SFX V 0 лагчаасаа .
SFX V 0 лагчаараа .
SFX V 0 лахтайгаа .
SFX V 0 лахлаараа .
SFX V 0 лангуутаа .
SFX V 0 лагчтайгаа .
SFX V 0 лагчийнхаа .
SFX V 0 лагчидтайгаа .
SFX V 0 лагчдынхаа .
SFX V 0 лагчдаасаа .
SFX V 0 лагчдаараа .
SFX V 0 лахгүйн .

SFX W Y 8
SFX W 0 хгүй .
SFX W 0 гч .
SFX W 0 гчид .
SFX W 0 гчийн .
SFX W 0 гчийг .
SFX W 0 гчгүй .
SFX W 0 гчийнх .
SFX W 0 гчидгүй .

SFX X Y 45
SFX X 0 хээ .
SFX X 0 эд .
SFX X 0 мээргүй .
SFX X 0 вэл .
SFX X 0 хийг .
SFX X 0 хийн .
SFX X 0 хийнх .
SFX X 0 хтэй .
SFX X 0 е .
SFX X 0 гчтэй .
SFX X 0 хээс .
SFX X 0 нгүүт .
SFX X 0 гчдийн .
SFX X 0 гчдийг .
SFX X 0 хээр .
SFX X 0 гчидтэй .
SFX X 0 гчдийнх .
SFX X 0 нгүүтээ .
SFX X 0 хээсээ .
SFX X 0 хээрээ .
SFX X 0 хэд .
SFX X 0 хийгээ .
SFX X 0 хийнхээ .
SFX X 0 хтэйгээ .
SFX X 0 хдээ .
SFX X 0 гчээ .
SFX X 0 нгээ .
SFX X 0 гчээс .
SFX X 0 гчээр .
SFX X 0 гчдээ .
SFX X 0 гчдэд .
SFX X 0 хлээр .
SFX X 0 гчдээс .
SFX X 0 гчдээр .
SFX X 0 гчээсээ .
SFX X 0 гчээрээ .
SFX X 0 гчийгээ .
SFX X 0 гчдэдээ .
SFX X 0 хлээрээ .
SFX X 0 гчтэйгээ .
SFX X 0 гчийнхээ .
SFX X 0 гчдээсээ .
SFX X 0 гчдээрээ .
SFX X 0 гчдийгээ .
SFX X 0 эгүй .

SFX Y Y 15
SFX Y 0 сон .
SFX Y 0 дог .
SFX Y 0 лоо .
SFX Y 0 догт .
SFX Y 0 догтоо .
SFX Y 0 догтой .
SFX Y 0 доггүй .
SFX Y 0 моор .
SFX Y 0 могц .
SFX Y 0 сонд .
SFX Y 0 могцоо .
SFX Y 0 мооргүй .
SFX Y 0 сондоо .
SFX Y 0 сонтой .
SFX Y 0 сонгүй .

SFX Z Y 55
SFX Z 0 дээ .
SFX Z 0 дэг .
SFX Z 0 дье .
SFX Z 0 дэх .
SFX Z 0 длээ .
SFX Z 0 дэхээ .
SFX Z 0 дэхэд .
SFX Z 0 дэхгүй .
SFX Z 0 дэхээс .
SFX Z 0 дэхээр .
SFX Z 0 дэхтэй .
SFX Z 0 дэхийн .
SFX Z 0 дэхийг .
SFX Z 0 дэхдээ .
SFX Z 0 дэн .
SFX Z 0 дээч .
SFX Z 0 дээд .
SFX Z 0 дэхийнх .
SFX Z 0 дэж .
SFX Z 0 дэвч .
SFX Z 0 дэв .
SFX Z 0 дээсэй .
SFX Z 0 дээрэй .
SFX Z 0 дээгүй .
SFX Z 0 дэнгээ .
SFX Z 0 дэхлээр .
SFX Z 0 дэнгүүт .
SFX Z 0 дсээр .
SFX Z 0 дмээр .
SFX Z 0 ддэг .
SFX Z 0 дтэл .
SFX Z 0 дсэнд .
SFX Z 0 дсэн .
SFX Z 0 дмэгц .
SFX Z 0 ддэгт .
SFX Z 0 двэл .
SFX Z 0 дтэлээ .
SFX Z 0 дсэнээ .
SFX Z 0 дсэний .
SFX Z 0 ддэгээ .
SFX Z 0 дсэнээс .
SFX Z 0 дсэнээр .
SFX Z 0 дсэнтэй .
SFX Z 0 дсэнийх .
SFX Z 0 дсэнийг .
SFX Z 0 дсэндээ .
SFX Z 0 дсэнгүй .
SFX Z 0 дмэгцээ .
SFX Z 0 ддэгээс .
SFX Z 0 ддэгээр .
SFX Z 0 ддэгтээ .
SFX Z 0 ддэгтэй .
SFX Z 0 ддэгийн .
SFX Z 0 ддэгийг .
SFX Z 0 ддэггүй .

SFX a Y 18
SFX a 0 мээргүй .
SFX a 0 сний .
SFX a 0 снийх .
SFX a 0 снийг .
SFX a 0 дгээ .
SFX a 0 снээс .
SFX a 0 снээ .
SFX a 0 дгээс .
SFX a 0 дгээр .
SFX a 0 снээр .
SFX a 0 снээсээ .
SFX a 0 снийхээ .
SFX a 0 дгээсээ .
SFX a 0 дгээрээ .
SFX a 0 дгийгээ .
SFX a 0 снээрээ .
SFX a 0 снийгээ .
SFX a 0 е .

SFX b Y 30
SFX b 0 ч .
SFX b 0 чид .
SFX b 0 чийг .
SFX b 0 чийн .
SFX b 0 чгүй .
SFX b 0 чийнх .
SFX b 0 чидгүй .
SFX b 0 чдын .
SFX b 0 чдыг .
SFX b 0 чдынх .
SFX b 0 чаа .
SFX b 0 чдаа .
SFX b 0 чдад .
SFX b 0 чтай .
SFX b 0 чаар .
SFX b 0 чаас .
SFX b 0 чдаас .
SFX b 0 чдаар .
SFX b 0 чидтай .
SFX b 0 чдадаа .
SFX b 0 чдыгаа .
SFX b 0 чийгаа .
SFX b 0 чаараа .
SFX b 0 чдынхаа .
SFX b 0 чдаасаа .
SFX b 0 чдаараа .
SFX b 0 чаасаа .
SFX b 0 чтайгаа .
SFX b 0 чийнхаа .
SFX b 0 чидтайгаа .

SFX c Y 34
SFX c 0 жээ .
SFX c 0 мааргүй .
SFX c 0 дагтайгаа .
SFX c 0 сантайгаа .
SFX c 0 вал .
SFX c 0 саны .
SFX c 0 дагаа .
SFX c 0 дагийн .
SFX c 0 дагаас .
SFX c 0 дагаар .
SFX c 0 саных .
SFX c 0 саныг .
SFX c 0 санаа .
SFX c 0 дагийг .
SFX c 0 санаас .
SFX c 0 санаар .
SFX c 0 дагийнх .
SFX c 0 агчидтайгаа .
SFX c 0 саныхаа .
SFX c 0 саныгаа .
SFX c 0 дагийгаа .
SFX c 0 дагаасаа .
SFX c 0 дагаараа .
SFX c 0 дагийнхаа .
SFX c 0 санаасаа .
SFX c 0 санаараа .
SFX c 0 ахгүйн .
SFX c 0 ахгүйг .
SFX c 0 ахгүйд .
SFX c 0 ахгүйгээ .
SFX c 0 ахгүйгээр .
SFX c 0 ахгүйгээс .
SFX c 0 ахгүйтэй .
SFX c 0 ана .
SFX d Y 3
SFX d 0 дгийн .
SFX d 0 дгийг .
SFX d 0 дгийнх .
SFX e Y 38
SFX e 0 гчийн .
SFX e 0 гчийг .
SFX e 0 гчгүй .
SFX e 0 гчийнх .
SFX e 0 хгүйг .
SFX e 0 хгүйн .
SFX e 0 хгүйд .
SFX e 0 лгүй .
SFX e 0 гчдын .
SFX e 0 гчдыг .
SFX e 0 гчдынх .
SFX e 0 нгуут .
SFX e 0 догтоо .
SFX e 0 догтой .
SFX e 0 доггүй .
SFX e 0 могцоо .
SFX e 0 сондоо .
SFX e 0 сонтой .
SFX e 0 сонгүй .
SFX e 0 сонсон .
SFX e 0 дгоос .
SFX e 0 дгоор .
SFX e 0 сноос .
SFX e 0 сныхоо .
SFX e 0 сноор .
SFX e 0 сныгоо .
SFX e 0 хоосоо .
SFX e 0 хоороо .
SFX e 0 хыгоо .
SFX e 0 хынхоо .
SFX e 0 гчтой .
SFX e 0 гчоос .
SFX e 0 гчоор .
SFX e 0 гчдоо .
SFX e 0 гчдод .
SFX e 0 гчдоос .
SFX e 0 гчдоор .
SFX e 0 хлоор .
SFX f Y 23
SFX f 0 ъя .
SFX f 0 саар .
SFX f 0 тал .
SFX f 0 вал .
SFX f 0 ан .
SFX f 0 ав .
SFX f 0 авч .
SFX f 0 ангаа .
SFX f 0 ангуут .
SFX f 0 саны .
SFX f 0 дагаа .
SFX f 0 дагийн .
SFX f 0 дагаас .
SFX f 0 дагаар .
SFX f 0 саных .
SFX f 0 саныг .
SFX f 0 санаа .
SFX f 0 дагийг .
SFX f 0 санаас .
SFX f 0 санаар .
SFX f 0 аж .
SFX f 0 талаа .
SFX f 0 ана .
